Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6771SV (1) 91 jm/jh S.F. 2393 Section 1. Section 422.11O, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The retail dealer has timely filed 3 the report required under section 452A.33, subsection 1, 4 paragraph âcâ , for the latest determination period ending prior 5 to the close of the retail dealerâs tax year. 6 Sec. 2. Section 422.11P, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 7 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 8 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The retail dealer has timely filed 9 the report required under section 452A.33, subsection 1, 10 paragraph âcâ , for the latest determination period ending prior 11 to the close of the retail dealerâs tax year. 12 Sec. 3. Section 422.11Y, subsection 3, paragraph a, Code 13 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 14 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (02) The retail dealer has timely filed 15 the report required under section 452A.33, subsection 1, 16 paragraph âcâ , for the latest determination period ending prior 17 to the close of the retail dealerâs tax year. 18 Sec. 4. Section 452A.33, subsection 1, paragraph c, 19 subparagraph (2), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 20 (2) (a) If a retail dealer fails to file the report as 21 required by this section or fails to maintain records required 22 to file the report the department may impose a civil penalty of 23 not more than one hundred dollars per occurrence in addition to 24 any other penalty provided by law. The penalty amount shall be 25 deposited into the general fund of the state. 26 (b) A retail dealer who fails to timely file a report as 27 required by this subsection prior to the close of the retail 28 dealerâs tax year is also ineligible to claim any tax credit 29 available under section 422.11O, 422.11P, or 422.11Y for the 30 tax year or any succeeding tax year until such time the report 31 is filed. 32